Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.160

Judge pro tempore—Remuneration.

(1) A judge of a court of record serving as a judge pro tempore of the court of appeals, as provided in RCW 2.06.150, shall receive, in addition to his or her regular salary, reimbursement for subsistence, lodging, and travel expenses in accordance with the rates applicable to state officers under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(2) A retired judge of a court of record in this state serving as a judge pro tempore of the court of appeals, as provided in RCW 2.06.150, shall receive, in addition to any retirement pay he or she may be receiving, the following compensation and expenses:

(a) Reimbursement for subsistence, lodging, and travel expenses in accordance with the rates applicable to state officers under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060; and

(b) During the period of his or her service as judge pro tempore, he or she shall receive as compensation sixty percent of one-two hundred and fiftieth of the annual salary of a court of appeals judge for each day of service: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the total amount of combined compensation received as salary and retirement by any judge in any calendar year shall not exceed the yearly salary of a full time judge.

(3) Whenever a judge of a court of record is appointed to serve as judge pro tempore of the court of appeals and a visiting judge is assigned to replace him or her, subsistence, lodging, and travel expenses incurred by such visiting judge as a result of such assignment shall be paid in accordance with the rates applicable to state officers under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, upon application of such judge from the appropriation of the court of appeals.

(4) A judge appointed as judge pro tempore of the court of appeals under RCW 2.06.150(2) shall continue to receive compensation in accordance with the rates applicable to the judge immediately before the expiration of the term.

(5) The provisions of RCW 2.06.150(1) and 2.06.160 (1) through (3) shall not be construed as impairing or enlarging any right or privilege acquired in any retirement or pension system by any judge or his or her dependents.

[ 1997 c 88 s 4; 1981 c 186 s 2; 1973 c 114 s 2.]